Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8133.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20-2-44 of the General Laws in Chapter 20-2 entitled "Licensing" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
20-2-44. Shellfish transplant program.
(a) In addition to any appropriation made pursuant to § 20-2-28.2, the general assembly
shall appropriate from the general fund to the division of marine fisheries the amount it deems
necessary for the purpose of maintaining a shellfish transplant program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2000, and thereafter, the division of marine fisheries shall develop a sustainable shellfish
management plan.
(b) On and after July 1, 2026, there shall be assessed and collected against all wastewater
treatment facilities, as defined in § 42-17.4-4, a fee of one cent ($0.01) per every ten thousand
(10,000) gallons of wastewater treatment facility effluent discharge from that facility. The fees
collected under this section shall be used to support the shellfish transplant program. Provided, the
provisions of this subsection shall apply both to public and privately-owned wastewater treatment
facilities.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005918
========